Utah statutes.
17-52-502.   Expanded county commission form of government.
(1)  Each county operating under an expanded county commission form of
government shall be governed by a county commission consisting of five or
seven members.
(2)  A county commission under the expanded county commission form of
government is both the county legislative body and the county executive and
has the powers, duties, and functions of a county legislative body under
Chapter 53, Part 2, County Legislative Body, and the powers, duties, and
functions of a county executive under Chapter 53, Part 3, County Executive.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in an optional plan adopted under this
chapter:
(a)  the term of office of each county commission member is four years;
(b)  the terms of county commission members shall be staggered so that
approximately half the members are elected at alternating regular general
election dates; and
(c)  each county commission member shall be elected.
(4) (a)  If multiple at-large county commission positions are vacant for an
election, the positions shall be designated "county commission seat A,"
"county commission seat B," and so on as necessary for the number of vacant
positions.
(b)  Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy when multiple
positions are vacant shall designate the letter of the county commission seat
for which the candidate is a candidate.
(c)  No person may file a declaration of candidacy for, be a candidate for, or
be elected to two county commission positions in the same election.
